Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-302 Surplus lines insurers.
(a) No surplus lines broker shall, either knowingly or without reasonable
investigation of the financial condition and general reputation of the insurer,
place insurance with a financially unsound insurer or with an insurer engaging
in an unfair practice.

(b) A surplus lines broker may place surplus
lines insurance only with insurers who are authorized to write that type of
insurance in the insurer's domiciliary state.

(c) A surplus lines broker shall not place coverage
with an unauthorized insurer unless, at the time of placement, the surplus
lines broker has determined that:

(1) The unauthorized insurer has capital and surplus
or its equivalent under the laws of its domiciliary state that equal the
greater of the minimum capital requirement of this State or a minimum of
$15,000,000; provided that:

(A) Minimum capital requirements may be
satisfied by the insurer's possessing less than the minimum capital and surplus
upon an affirmative finding of acceptability by the commissioner;

(B) A finding of acceptability pursuant to
subparagraph (A) shall be based upon factors such as quality of management,
capital and surplus of any parent company, company underwriting profit and
investment income trends, market availability, and company record and
reputation within the industry; and

(C) The commissioner shall not make an
affirmative finding of acceptability pursuant to subparagraph (A) if the
unauthorized insurer's capital and surplus is less than $4,500,000; or

(2) For an insurer not domiciled in the United States
or its territories, the insurer shall be listed on the Quarterly Listing of
Alien Insurers maintained by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners International Insurers Department; provided that:

(A) If an alien insurer is not in the
Quarterly Listing of Alien Insurers, the surplus lines broker shall maintain in
the broker's office evidence of the financial responsibility of the insurer;
and

(B) Evidence satisfactory to the commissioner
that the insurer maintains in the United States an irrevocable trust fund in
either a national bank or a member of the Federal Reserve System in an amount
of not less than $5,400,000 consisting of cash, securities, letters of credit,
or of investments of substantially the same character and quality as those
which are eligible investments for the capital and statutory reserves of
authorized insurers writing like kinds of insurance in this State, for the
protection of all its policyholders in the United States, shall constitute
prima facie evidence of the financial responsibility of the insurer.

(d) The commissioner is authorized to enter
into a cooperative agreement or interstate agreement or compact to establish
additional and alternative nationwide uniform eligibility requirements that
shall be applicable to unauthorized insurers domiciled in another state. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 205, §12; am L 2000, c 182, §7; am L 2011,
c 68, §9]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next